Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 Board of Community Supervision; Department of Community Supervision

42-3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Supervision.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community supervision.

“Community supervision officer” means an individual employed by DCS who supervises probationers or parolees.

“DCS” means the Department of Community Supervision.

“Split sentence” means any felony sentence that includes a term of imprisonment followed by a term of probation.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-2.
Board of Community Supervision created; membership; creation of Program and Treatment Completion Certificate; adoption of rules and regulations; duties.

There is created the Board of Community Supervision which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Community Supervision. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board of Corrections as they exist on June 30, 2015, with regard to the probation division of the Department of Corrections and supervision of probationers unless otherwise provided in this chapter are transferred to the Board of Community Supervision effective July 1, 2015. The powers, functions, and duties of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles as they exist on June 30, 2015, with regard to the supervision of parolees, unless otherwise provided in this chapter are transferred to the Board of Community Supervision effective July 1, 2015. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board of Juvenile Justice and the Department of Juvenile Justice as they exist on June 30, 2016, with regard to the probation supervision of children and reentry services for children who have been released from restrictive custody and who were adjudicated for a Class A designated felony act or Class B designated felony act, as such terms are defined in Code Section 15-11-2, are transferred to the Board of Community Supervision effective July 1, 2016, except as otherwise provided by the rules and regulations of the Board of Juvenile Justice governing such supervision. The powers, functions, and duties of the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council as they exist on June 30, 2015, are transferred to the Board of Community Supervision effective July 1, 2015. The powers, functions, and duties of the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry as they exist on June 30, 2016, with regard to reentry services are transferred to the board and DCS effective July 1, 2016. The powers, functions, and duties of the board that were transferred from the former County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council as it existed on June 30, 2015, to the board are transferred to DCS effective July 1, 2016; provided, however, that the power to set policy and promulgate rules and regulations for DCS shall be retained by the board.

The board shall consist of 11 members. The commissioner of corrections, commissioner of juvenile justice, chairperson and vice chairperson of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services, and commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities shall be members of the board and shall serve on the board so long as they remain in their appointed positions. The Governor shall appoint:

A sheriff who shall serve an initial term ending June 30, 2019, each subsequent term being four years;

A mayor or city manager who shall serve an initial term ending June 30, 2018, each subsequent term being four years;

A county commissioner or county manager who shall serve an initial term ending June 30, 2017, each subsequent term being four years;

An individual who owns or is employed by a private corporation, private enterprise, private agency, or other private entity that is providing probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title who shall serve an initial term ending June 30, 2019, each subsequent term being four years; and

An individual who is employed by a governing authority of a county, municipality, or consolidated government that is providing probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title who shall serve an initial term ending June 30, 2018, each subsequent term being four years.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant. An appointment to fill a vacancy, other than by expiration of a term of office, shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board, elected by and from the membership of the board, who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive per diem and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget and in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Evidence based practices” means supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduce recidivism among individuals who are under some form of correctional supervision.

“Recidivism” means returning to prison or jail within three years of being placed on probation or being discharged or released from a department or jail facility.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the management and treatment of probationers and parolees to ensure that evidence based practices, including the use of a risk and needs assessment and any other method the board deems appropriate, guide decisions related to managing probationers and parolees in the community. Any risk and needs assessment instrument shall be revalidated by January 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter. The board shall require DCS to collect and analyze data and performance outcomes relevant to the level and type of treatment given to a probationer or parolee and the outcome of the treatment on his or her recidivism and prepare an annual report regarding such information which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Judiciary Committee.

Using evidence based practices, the board shall evaluate the quality of the programming utilized at day reporting centers by January 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter, and shall publicly publish its report.

The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia or other relevant educational organizations and agencies, may provide educational programs for probationers and shall exercise program approval authority. The board may enter into written agreements with other educational organizations and agencies in order to provide probationers with such education and employment skills most likely to encourage gainful employment and discourage return to criminal activity. The board may also enter into agreements with other educational organizations and agencies to attain program certification for its vocational and technical education programs.

The board shall create a Program and Treatment Completion Certificate that may be issued to probationers under the rules and regulations of the board. Such certificate shall symbolize a probationer’s achievements toward successful reentry into society. The board’s rules and regulations relating to the issuance of such certificate shall take into account a probationer’s violations of the terms of his or her probation and any other factor the board deems relevant to an individual’s qualification for such certificate. The board’s rules and regulations shall specify eligibility considerations and requirements for completion of such certificate.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state, and no action shall be maintained against the state or any agency or department thereof for issuance of or failure to issue any Program and Treatment Completion Certificate.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations and such rules and regulations shall be adopted, established, promulgated, amended, repealed, filed, and published in accordance with the applicable provisions and procedure as set forth in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The courts shall take judicial notice of any such rules or regulations.

As used in this Code section, the term “rules and regulations” shall have the same meaning as the word “rule” as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 50-13-2.

The board shall perform duties required of it by law and shall, in addition thereto, be responsible for promulgation of all rules and regulations not in conflict with this chapter that may be necessary and appropriate to the administration of DCS, to the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter and Chapters 8 and 9 of this title, and to the performance of the duties and functions of DCS as set forth in this chapter and Chapters 8 and 9 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-3/SB 174.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (a), deleted “and the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry” following “Community Supervision” at the end of the first sentence, in the fourth sentence,
inserted “and reentry services for children” and inserted “, except as otherwise provided by the rules and regulations of the Board of Juvenile Justice governing such supervision” at the end, and added the last two sentences; in subsection (b), substituted “11 members” for “nine members” at the end of the first sentence, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(2), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(3), and added paragraphs (b)(4) and (b)(5); and, in subsection (j), twice deleted “and the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry” following “DCS”.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “department” for “Department of Corrections” in subparagraph (g)(1)(B); in paragraph (g)(2), added the second sentence, and substituted “House Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Judiciary Committee” for “House Committee on State Properties and the Senate State Institutions and Property Committee” at the end of the last sentence; added paragraph (g)(3); added present subsection (h); and redesignated former subsections (h) through (j) as present subsections (i) through (k), respectively.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-3-3.
Department of Community Supervision created; responsibilities.

There is created the Department of Community Supervision. DCS shall be the agency primarily responsible for:

Supervision of all defendants who receive a felony sentence of straight probation;

Supervision of all defendants who receive a split sentence;

Supervision of all defendants placed on parole or other conditional release from imprisonment by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles;

Supervision of juvenile offenders released from restrictive custody due to an adjudication for a Class A designated felony act or Class B designated felony act, as such terms are defined in Code Section 15-11-2, except as otherwise provided by the rules and regulations of the Board of Juvenile Justice governing such supervision;

Administration of laws, rules, and regulations relating to probation and parole supervision, as provided for by law;

Enforcement of laws, rules, and regulations relating to probation and parole supervision, as provided for by law;

Administration of laws as provided in this chapter and Chapters 8 and 9 of this title;

Regulating entities and individuals that provide probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title;

Reviewing the uniform professional standards for private probation officers and uniform contract standards for private probation contracts established in Code Section 42-8-107 and submit a report with its recommendations to the board. DCS shall submit its initial report on or before January 1, 2018, and shall continue such reviews every two years thereafter. Such report shall provide information which will allow the board to review the effectiveness of the uniform professional standards and uniform contract standards and, if necessary, to revise such standards;

Producing an annual summary report; and

Administering laws, rules, and regulations relating to misdemeanor probation supervision pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title.

DCS shall ensure that community supervision officers who supervise juvenile offenders receive the same training to work specifically with children and adolescents as is provided for Department of Juvenile Justice probation officers. DCS shall offer the same array of services to juvenile offenders as are available to offenders who are committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice who are not placed in restrictive custody. With respect to the supervision of children, DCS shall be mindful of the purpose of Chapter 11 of Title 15 as set forth in Code Section 15-11-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-2/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, near the beginning of paragraph (a)(4), substituted “released from” for “when such offender had been placed in” and at the end substituted “except as otherwise provided by the rules and regulations of the Board of Juvenile Justice governing such supervision” for “and is released from such custody”; deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(6); substituted “and Chapters 8 and 9 of this title” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(7); and added paragraphs (a)(8) through (a)(11).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-3-4.
Commissioner of community supervision; duties.

There shall be a commissioner of community supervision who shall be both appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Subject to the policies, rules, and regulations established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions of DCS.

The commissioner shall receive an annual salary to be set by the Governor which shall be his or her total compensation for services as commissioner. The commissioner shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred by him or her in carrying out his or her official duties.

The position of commissioner shall be a separate and distinct position from any other position in state government. The duties of the commissioner shall be performed by the commissioner and not by any other officer of state government, and the commissioner shall not perform the duties of any other officer of state government.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-5.
Administrative functions of department.

The commissioner, with the approval of the board, may establish units within DCS as he or she deems proper for its administration and shall designate persons to be assistant commissioners of each unit and to exercise authority as he or she may delegate to them in writing. The commissioner shall establish an offender transition and reentry unit within DCS to coordinate successful offender reentry in this state, reduce recidivism, enhance public safety through collaboration among stakeholders, and assist in ensuring the appropriate and responsible use of cost savings realized by justice reforms through reinvestment in evidence based, community centered services. The commissioner shall establish a misdemeanor probation unit within DCS to coordinate and oversee services provided under Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title. The commissioner shall establish a victim services unit within DCS to coordinate:

Payment of court ordered restitution; and

Victim services, including, but not limited to, payments available to victims as provided by law and assisting victims with support services.

The commissioner shall have the authority to employ as many individuals as he or she deems necessary for the administration of DCS and for the discharge of the duties of his or her office. The commissioner shall issue all necessary directions, instructions, orders, and rules applicable to employees of DCS. The commissioner shall have authority, as the commissioner deems proper, to employ, assign, compensate, and discharge employees of DCS within the limitations of DCS’s appropriation and the restrictions set forth by law.

No employee of DCS shall be compensated for services to DCS on a commission or contingent fee basis.

Neither the commissioner nor any community supervision officer or employee of DCS shall be given or receive any fee, compensation, loan, gift, or other thing of value in addition to the compensation and expense allowance provided by law for any service or pretended service either rendered or to be rendered as commissioner or as a community supervision officer or employee of DCS.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-3/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added the second and third sentences in subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-3-6.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner, with the approval of the board, shall have the power to make and publish reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this title or other laws or with the Constitution of this state or of the United States for the administration of this chapter or any law which it is his or her duty to administer.

The commissioner may prescribe forms as he or she deems necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and Chapters 8 and 9 of this title or any law which it is his or her duty to administer.

The commissioner may confer all powers of a police officer of this state, including, but not limited to, the power to make summary arrests for violations of any of the criminal laws of this state and the power to carry weapons, upon persons in the commissioner’s employment as the commissioner deems necessary, provided that individuals so designated meet the requirements specified in all applicable laws.

The commissioner or his or her designee may authorize certain persons in the commissioner’s employment to assist law enforcement officers or correctional officers of local governments in preserving order and peace when so requested by such local authorities.

The following rules and regulations shall remain in full force and effect as rules and regulations of DCS until amended, repealed, or superseded by rules or regulations adopted by the board:

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the Advisory Council for Probation which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the state-wide probation system to DCS;

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the Department of Corrections or the Board of Corrections which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the Department of Corrections to DCS;

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to DCS;

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Board of Juvenile Justice which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the Department of Juvenile Justice to DCS;

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council to DCS; and

All rules and regulations previously adopted by the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry which relate to functions transferred under this chapter from the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry to DCS.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-4/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (e)(4); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (e)(5); and added paragraph (e)(6).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-3-7.
Transfer of prior appropriations, personnel, equipment, and facilities; probation and parole not affected by creation of department.

Appropriations to the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry for functions transferred to DCS pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred to DCS as provided for in Code Section 45-12-90. Personnel, equipment, and facilities previously employed by the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry for functions transferred to DCS pursuant to this chapter shall likewise be transferred to DCS. Any disagreement as to any of such transfers shall be resolved by the Governor. Any individual who is employed by the Department of Corrections as a probation officer or probation supervisor or by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles as a parole officer on or before July 1, 2016, and who is required by the terms of his or her employment to comply with the requirements of Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act,” may remain in the employment of the employing agency but shall be transferred for administrative purposes only to DCS on July 1, 2015.

The enactment of this chapter and the Act by which it is enacted shall not affect or abate the status of probation, parole, a probation revocation, or a parole revocation which occurred prior to July 1, 2015.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-5/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (a), twice substituted “the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and the Governor’s Office of Transition, Support, and Reentry” for “and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles” and inserted “State” in the last sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-3-8.
Employee benefit fund.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Employee” means a full-time or part-time employee of DCS or an employee serving under contract with DCS.

“Employee benefit fund” means an account containing the facility’s profits generated from vending services maintained by a local facility.

“Executive director of the facility” means the chief community supervision officer or such other head of a facility.

“Facility” means a community supervision office or such other similar property under the jurisdiction or operation of DCS.

“Vending services” means one or more vending machines in a location easily accessible by employees, which services may also be accessible by members of the general public, but which vending machines do not require a manager or attendant for the purpose of purchasing food or drink items. Vending services shall be for the provision of snack or food items or nonalcoholic beverages and shall not include any tobacco products or alcoholic beverages.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide an employee benefit as set forth in this Code section, which benefit shall be of de minimis cost to the state and which shall in turn benefit the state through the retention of dedicated and experienced employees.

Any other provision of the law notwithstanding, a facility is authorized to purchase vending machines or enter into vending service agreements by contract, sublease, or license for the purpose of providing vending services to each facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections. Vending services shall be provided in any facility where the operation of such vending services is capable of generating a profit for that facility. The facility’s profits generated from the vending services shall be maintained by the local facility under the authority of the executive director of the facility in an interest-bearing account, and the account shall be designated the employee benefit fund.

The employee benefit fund shall be administered by a committee of five representatives of the facility to be selected by the chief community supervision officer for such facility. Funds from the account may be spent as determined by a majority vote of the committee. Funds may be expended on an individual employee of the facility for the purpose of recognizing a death, birth, marriage, or prolonged illness or to provide assistance in the event of a natural disaster or devastation adversely affecting an employee or an employee’s immediate family member. Funds may also be expended on an item or activity which shall benefit all employees of the facility equally for the purposes of developing camaraderie or otherwise fostering loyalty to DCS or bringing together the employees of the facility for a meeting, training session, or similar gathering. Funds spent for an individual employee shall not exceed $250.00 per person per event, and funds expended for employee gatherings or items shall not exceed $1,000.00 per event or single item; provided, however, that events conducted for the benefit of employees of an entire institution shall not exceed $4,500.00 per event.

The employee benefit fund account of each facility shall be reviewed and audited by the administrative office of the local facility and by DCS in accordance with standards and procedures established by DCS. No account shall maintain funds in excess of $5,000.00. Any funds collected which cause the fund balance to exceed $5,000.00 shall be remitted to DCS’s general operating budget.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a facility from purchasing vending machines or providing or maintaining vending services which do not generate a profit, provided that such services are of no cost to DCS, nor shall this Code section be construed so as to prohibit a private provider of vending services from making or retaining a profit pursuant to any agreement for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-9.
Retention of issued weapon and badge; survivor’s rights to badge.

An employee leaving the service of DCS under honorable conditions who has accumulated 20 or more years of service with DCS as a community supervision officer, or 20 or more years of combined service as a parole officer with the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, a probation officer or supervisor with the Department of Corrections, and community supervision officer, shall be entitled as part of such employee’s compensation to retain his or her DCS issued weapon and badge.

As used in this subsection, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a community supervision officer. When a community supervision officer leaves DCS as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such officer shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

A community supervision officer who is killed in the line of duty shall be entitled to have his or her DCS issued badge given to a surviving family member.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-10.
Appeals of sanctions; venue; no waiver of immunity.

In order to appeal a sanction imposed by the board, a person shall remit a request for a hearing, in writing by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the board within 30 days from the date of personal notice or receipt of the notice of the sanction; otherwise, the right to such hearing shall be deemed waived. The board shall hold a hearing as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” If the sanction is sustained, the person who received the sanction shall have a right to file for a judicial review of the final decision, as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; while such appeal is pending, the order of the board shall not be stayed. A petition for judicial review shall name the board as defendant, shall be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, and shall be filed in the superior court of the county where the offices of the board are located.

Actions at law and in equity against the board or any of its members predicated upon omissions or acts done in a member’s official capacity or under color thereof shall be brought in the superior court of the county where the offices of the board are located; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed as waiving the immunity of the state to be sued without its consent.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 5-6/SB 367.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 enactment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (2016).